Texas, session 892, HB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: ARTICLE 1.  GUARANTEE OF PUBLIC SCHOOL BONDS PROHIBITED SECTION 1.001.  The heading to Subchapter C, Chapter 45, Education Code, is amended to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER C.  GUARANTEE OF [GUARANTEED] BONDS PROHIBITED SECTION 1.002.  Section 45.052, Education Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 45.052.  GUARANTEE OF BONDS PROHIBITED. (a)  Bonds [On approval by the commissioner, bonds] issued under Subchapter A by a school district or Chapter 53 for a charter district, including refunding and refinanced bonds, may not be [are] guaranteed or otherwise underwritten by the corpus and income of the permanent school fund. (b)  A [Notwithstanding any amendment of this subchapter or other law, the] guarantee of or credit enhancement provided for a [under this subchapter of] school district or charter district bond approved before September 1, 2025, [bonds] remains in effect until the date those bonds mature or are defeased in accordance with state law. ARTICLE 2.  CONFORMING CHANGES SECTION 2.001.  Section 12.141(c), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  The agency shall annually review the amount of funds in the charter school liquidation fund and transfer any funds exceeding $2 million[: [(1)]  for use in funding a grant program established by the agency to: (1) [(A)]  encourage high school students to enter the teaching profession; and (2) [(B)]  assist current paraprofessionals and instructional aides in pursuing the necessary credentials to become full-time teachers[; or [(2)  to the comptroller to deposit in the charter district bond guarantee reserve fund under Section 45.0571]. SECTION 2.002.  Section 43.052(a), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The State Board of Education may incorporate the Texas Permanent School Fund Corporation and delegate to the corporation the board's authority to manage and invest[: [(1)]  the permanent school fund under Section 43.003[; and [(2)  the charter district bond guarantee reserve fund under Section 45.0571]. SECTION 2.003.  Section 45.051(1-a), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (1-a)  "Charter district" means an open-enrollment charter school designated as a charter district under Section 12.135 as that section existed immediately before September 1, 2025. SECTION 2.004.  Section 53.02(10), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (10)  "Authorized charter school" means an open-enrollment charter school that holds a charter granted under Subchapter D, Chapter 12[, and includes an open-enrollment charter school designated as a charter district as provided by Section 12.135]. SECTION 2.005.  Section 1201.0245(i), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (i)  A political subdivision may extend the maturity date of an issued capital appreciation bond only if: (1)  the extension of the maturity date will decrease the total amount of projected principal and interest to maturity; or (2)  the political subdivision is a school district and[: [(A)]  the maximum legally allowable tax rate for indebtedness has been adopted[; and [(B)  the Texas Education Agency certifies in writing that the solvency of the permanent school fund's bond guarantee program would be threatened without the extension]. SECTION 2.006.  The following provisions of the Education Code are repealed: (1)  Section 7.055(b)(38); (2)  Section 7.102(c)(33); (3)  Section 12.135; (4)  Section 43.067; (5)  Sections 45.051(1) and (2); (6)  Sections 45.053, 45.0531, 45.0532, 45.0533, 45.054, 45.0541, 45.055, 45.056, 45.057, 45.0571, 45.058, 45.059, 45.0591, 45.060, 45.061, 45.062, and 45.063; (7)  Subchapter I, Chapter 45; (8)  Section 48.273(g); and (9)  Section 53.351(f-1). ARTICLE 3.  TRANSITION; EFFECTIVE DATE SECTION 3.001.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to a guarantee of or credit enhancement provided for a school district or charter district bond approved on or after the effective date of this Act.  A guarantee of or credit enhancement provided for a school district or charter district bond approved before the effective date of this Act remains in effect until the date those bonds mature or are defeased in accordance with state law, and the former law is continued for that purpose. SECTION 3.002.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.